Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB893.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1799.7 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1799.7. Rates.* * *(i) Widowed persons.--For any financial responsibility policy written, delivered or renewed on or after the effective date of this subsection, in establishing or maintaining an insured's private passenger motor vehicle rate or classification respecting the operation of a private passenger motor vehicle, a widowed person shall not be treated differently than a person who is married.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.1234567891011121314151617